Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1028.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204(c) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act, is amended to read:Section 204. Legal advice and civil matters.* * *(c) Civil litigation; collection of debts.--The Attorney General shall represent the Commonwealth and all Commonwealth agencies and upon request, the Departments of Auditor General and State Treasury and the Public Utility Commission in any action brought by or against the Commonwealth or its agencies, and may intervene in any other action, including those involving charitable bequests and trusts or the constitutionality of any statute. The Attorney General may investigate conduct that may constitute a violation of the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the "Pennsylvania Human Relations Act," when the Attorney General determines that the matter is of Statewide importance. In conducting an investigation of conduct that may constitute a violation of the "Pennsylvania Human Relations Act," the Attorney General may subpoena witness testimony, documents and other evidence relevant to the investigation and may invoke the aid of a court of competent jurisdiction to issue an order requiring a subpoenaed person to comply. If the Attorney General determines that a violation of the "Pennsylvania Human Relations Act" occurred or is occurring, the Attorney General may file an action in a court of jurisdiction and shall represent the Commonwealth and its citizens in such action where a violation of the "Pennsylvania Human Relations Act" and any other civil rights law of the United States or the 20250SB1028PN1193 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth is involved. The Attorney General shall represent the Commonwealth and its citizens in any action brought for violation of the antitrust laws of the United States and the Commonwealth. The Attorney General shall collect, by suit or otherwise, all debts, taxes and accounts due the Commonwealth which shall be referred to and placed with the Attorney General for collection by any Commonwealth agency; the Attorney General shall keep a proper docket or dockets, duly indexed, of all such claims, showing whether they are in litigation and their nature and condition. The Attorney General may, upon determining that it is more efficient or otherwise is in the best interest of the Commonwealth, authorize the General Counsel or the counsel for an independent agency to initiate, conduct or defend any particular litigation or category of litigation in his stead. The Attorney General shall approve all settlements over such maximum amounts as he shall determine arising out of claims brought against the Commonwealth pursuant to 42 Pa.C.S. § 5110.* * *Section 2. Section 205(b) of the act is amended, subsection (a) is amended by adding a paragraph and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 205. Criminal prosecutions.(a) Prosecutions.--The Attorney General shall have the power to prosecute in any county criminal court the following cases:* * *(9) Criminal charges involving ethnic intimidation as provided for in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2710 (relating to ethnic intimidation) and criminal charges under 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses) for an offense involving conduct that may constitute a violation of the act of October 27, 1955 20250SB1028PN1193 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the "Pennsylvania Human Relations Act."(b) Concurrent jurisdiction to prosecute.--The Attorney General shall have the concurrent prosecutorial jurisdiction with the district attorney for cases arising under subsection (a)(1), (2) [and], (6) and (9) and may refer to the district attorney with his consent any violation or alleged violation of the criminal laws of the Commonwealth which may come to his notice.(b.1) Assistance in ethnic intimidation cases.--Upon the request of a district attorney who lacks the resources to conduct an adequate investigation or the prosecution of a criminal case or matter involving ethnic intimidation as provided for in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2710, the Attorney General, in lieu of assuming jurisdiction over the investigation or prosecution under subsection (a)(3), may provide technical, forensic, prosecutorial or any other form of assistance to the district attorney in the investigation or the prosecution of the criminal case or m atter. * * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1028PN1193 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021